District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.57

Insurance.

A nonprofit corporation may purchase insurance on behalf of an individual who is or was a director or officer of the corporation, or who, while a director or officer of the corporation, serves or served at the corporation’s request as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other entity, against liability asserted against or incurred by the individual in that capacity or arising from the individual’s status as a director or officer, whether or not the corporation would have power to indemnify or advance expenses to the individual against the same liability under this part.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720